Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-307 Mutual accident and health or
sickness insurer. (a) When applying for a certificate of authority, a
domestic mutual accident and health or sickness insurer shall:

(1) Have at least five hundred applications from at
least five hundred persons for individual accident and health or sickness
insurance providing not more than $1,000 of accidental death benefit and not
more than $25 of weekly indemnity for each applicant;

(2) Have collected from each applicant the proper
premium for one year, and have so received from all applicants premiums
aggregating at least $25,000; and

(3) Have a surplus over all liabilities, as at
completion of issuance of the insurance contracts so applied for, amounting to
not less than $450,000.

(b) In lieu of the applications, premiums, and
surplus, it is required to have a surplus amounting to not less than $675,000
over all liabilities. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2 as superseded by c 348, §9; am L
2002, c 155, §10]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next